Missouri, session 2026, HB2427.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 478.600, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 478.600, to read as follows:
478.600. 1. There shall be four circuit judges in the eleventh judicial circuit. These
judges shall sit in divisions numbered one, two, three and four. Beginning on January 1,
2007, there shall be six circuit judges in the eleventh judicial circuit and these judges shall sit
in divisions numbered one, two, three, four, five, and seven. The division five associate
circuit judge position and the division seven associate circuit judge position shall become
circuit judge positions beginning January 1, 2007, and shall be numbered as divisions five and
seven. Beginning January 1, 2029, there shall be seven circuit judges in the eleventh
judicial circuit and these judges shall sit in divisions numbered one, two, three, four,
five, seven, and seventeen.
2. The circuit judge in division two shall be elected in 1980. The circuit judge in
division four shall be elected in 1982. The circuit judge in division one shall be elected in
1984. The circuit judge in division three shall be elected in 1992. The circuit judges in
divisions five and seven shall be elected for a six-year term in 2006. The circuit judge in
division seventeen shall be elected in 2028 for a two-year term and thereafter in 2030 for
a six-year term.
3. Beginning January 1, 2007, the family court commissioner positions in the
eleventh judicial circuit appointed under section 487.020 shall become associate circuit judge
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2427 2
positions in all respects and shall be designated as divisions nine and ten respectively. These
positions may retain the duties and responsibilities with regard to the family court. The
associate circuit judges in divisions nine and ten shall be elected in 2006 for full four-year
terms.
4. Beginning on January 1, 2007, the treatment court commissioner position in the
eleventh judicial circuit appointed under section 478.003 shall become an associate circuit
judge position in all respects. Such associate circuit judge shall be elected in 2006 for a full
four-year term. This associate circuit judgeship shall not be included in the statutory formula
for authorizing additional associate circuit judgeships per county under section 478.320.
5. Beginning in fiscal year 2015, there shall be one additional associate circuit judge
position in the eleventh judicial circuit. The associate circuit judge shall be elected in 2016.
This associate circuit judgeship shall not be included in the statutory formula for authorizing
additional circuit judgeships per county under section 478.320. Beginning in fiscal year
2019, there shall be one additional associate circuit judge position in the eleventh judicial
circuit. The associate circuit judge shall be elected in 2020. This associate circuit judgeship
shall not be included in the statutory formula for authorizing additional circuit judgeships per
county under section 478.320. Beginning fiscal year 2027, there shall be two additional
associate circuit judge positions in the eleventh judicial circuit. The associate circuit
judges shall be elected in 2028. These associate circuit judgeships shall not be included
in the statutory formula for authorizing additional circuit judgeships per county under
section 478.320.
✔